Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 1. Generally

§ 461.
Actions by State.

The limitations prescribed in this chapter for the commencement of actions shall apply to the same actions when brought in the name of the State, or otherwise, for the benefit of the State, as in actions brought by citizens.

§ 462.
Lands for a public, pious, or charitable use.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall extend to lands given, granted, sequestered, or appropriated to a public, pious, or charitable use, or to lands belonging to the State.

Particular cases.

Focus of the charitable exemption from the statute of limitations is not on lands held by a public, pious or charitable user but rather on lands given, granted, sequestered or appropriated to a public, pious or charitable use. Defendant’s predecessor’s only use of the property during its years of ownership was as a charitable summer camp, and thus the land was appropriated to a charitable use during the entirety of its ownership. Mahoney v. Tara, LLC, 2014 VT 90, 197 Vt. 412, 107 A.3d 887, 2014 Vt. LEXIS 100 (2014).

Because the trial court’s reading of the public, pious or charitable use exception to the statutory 15-year prescriptive period was in line with the court’s precedent, with precedents from other jurisdictions, and with the policy concerns behind the provision, the trial court properly held that plaintiffs could not rely on the years during which a church owned the property in question and dedicated it to a public, pious or charitable use to make their adverse possession claims. Roy v. Woodstock Cmty. Trust, Inc., 2013 VT 100A, 94 Vt. 530, 195 A.3d 427, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 106 (Nov. 1, 2013).

As there was no dispute that defendant’s property, when owned by a church, was dedicated to pious use and operated on a nonprofit basis, the pious-use exemption negated plaintiffs’ claim for adverse possession. Roy v. Woodstock Cmty. Trust, Inc., 2013 VT 100A, 94 Vt. 530, 195 A.3d 427, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 106 (Nov. 1, 2013).

Policy behind the exception for public, pious, or charitable uses—that land should not be lost to the State and public through the laches or ignorance of the public or of officials representing it—applies with equal force to claims of boundary by acquiescence. Accordingly, plaintiffs’ boundary-by-acquiescence claim was barred when the property had been used by a church for pious uses. Roy v. Woodstock Cmty. Trust, Inc., 2013 VT 100A, 94 Vt. 530, 195 A.3d 427, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 106 (Nov. 1, 2013).

Reversal and remand were required when the trial court relied on the name of an organization to infer that its use of the property in question necessarily had a pious or charitable purpose. The name alone did not reveal whether the use of the property was for a privileged purpose. Mahoney v. Tara, LLC, 2011 VT 3, 189 Vt. 557, 15 A.3d 122, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 3 (2011) (mem.).

§ 463.
Counterclaims and cross-claims.

A cross-claim or counterclaim shall not be brought if an independent action upon the same claim would have been barred under the provisions of this chapter at the time of commencement of the plaintiff’s action, except that a counterclaim arising out of the transaction or occurrence that is the subject matter of plaintiff’s claim shall be allowed, to the extent of plaintiff’s demand, at any time.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 464.
Actions specially limited by other provisions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not affect an action otherwise specially limited by law.

§ 465.
Limitations or waiving limitation of actions in contracts.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, any provision in a contract which limits the time in which an action may be brought under the contract or which waives the statute of limitations shall be null and void.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 187

.

§ 466.
When action deemed commenced.

For the purpose of determining whether a period of limitation prescribed in this chapter has run, an action shall be deemed commenced upon the filing of the complaint with the clerk of the court in which the action is being brought if the action is commenced by filing or upon service of the summons and complaint if the action is commenced by service.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 233, eff. March 29, 1972.